Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
Claim to Recover Property from Administrator

393A.490.
Claim of another state to recover property.

If the administrator knows that property held by the administrator under this chapter is subject to a superior claim of another state, the administrator shall:

Report and pay or deliver the property to the other state; or

Return the property to the holder so that the holder may pay or deliver the property to the other state.

The administrator shall not be required to enter into an agreement to transfer property to the other state under subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 49, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.500.
When property subject to recovery by another state.

Property held under this chapter by the administrator shall be subject to the right of another state to take custody of the property if:

The property was paid or delivered to the administrator because the records of the holder did not reflect a last-known address in the other state of the apparent owner and:

The other state establishes that the last-known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property was in the other state; or

Under the law of the other state, the property has become subject to a claim by the other state of abandonment;

The records of the holder did not accurately identify the owner of the property, the last-known address of the owner was in another state, and, under the law of the other state, the property has become subject to a claim by the other state of abandonment;

The property was subject to the custody of the administrator of this state under KRS

393A.190

and, under the law of the state of domicile of the holder, the property has become subject to a claim of abandonment by the state of domicile of the holder; or

The property:

Is a sum payable on a traveler’s check, money order, or similar instrument that was purchased in the other state and delivered to the administrator under KRS

393A.200

; and

Under the law of the other state, has become subject to a claim by the other state of abandonment.

A claim by another state to recover property under this section shall be presented in a form prescribed by the administrator, unless the administrator waives presentation of the form.

The administrator shall decide a claim under this section not later than ninety (90) days after it is presented. If the administrator determines that the other state is entitled under subsection (1) of this section to custody of the property, the administrator shall allow the claim and pay or deliver the property to the other state.

The administrator may require another state, before recovering property under this section, to agree to indemnify this state and its agents, officers, and employees against any liability on a claim to the property.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 50, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.510.
Claim for property by person claiming to be owner.

A person claiming to be the owner of property held under this chapter by the administrator may file a claim for the property on a form prescribed by the administrator. The claimant shall verify the claim as to its completeness and accuracy.

The administrator may permit persons claiming to be the owner of property to submit claims in electronic format.

The administrator may waive the requirement in subsection (1) of this section and may pay or deliver property directly to a person if:

The person receiving the property or payment is shown to be the apparent owner included on a report filed under KRS

393A.220

;

The administrator reasonably believes the person is entitled to receive the property or payment; and

The property has a value of less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 51, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.520.
When administrator must honor claim for property.

The administrator shall pay or deliver property to a claimant under KRS 393A.510(1) if the administrator receives evidence sufficient to establish to the satisfaction of the administrator that the claimant is the owner of the property.

Not later than ninety (90) days after a claim is filed under KRS 393A.510(1), the administrator shall allow or deny the claim and give the claimant notice in a record of the decision.

If the claim is denied under subsection (2) of this section:

The administrator shall inform the claimant of the reason for the denial and specify what additional evidence, if any, is required for the claim to be allowed;

The claimant may file an amended claim with the administrator or request an administrative hearing under KRS

393A.540

; and

The administrator shall consider an amended claim filed under paragraph (b) of this subsection as an initial claim.

If the administrator does not take action on a claim during the ninety (90) day period following the filing of a claim under KRS 393A.510(1), the claim shall be deemed denied.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 52, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.530.
Allowance of claim for property.

Not later than thirty (30) days after a claim is allowed under KRS 393A.520(2), the administrator shall pay or deliver to the owner the property or pay to the owner the net proceeds of a sale of the property. On request of the owner, the administrator may sell or liquidate a security and pay the net proceeds to the owner, even if the security had been held by the administrator for less than three (3) years or the administrator has not complied with the notice requirements under KRS

393A.410

.

Property held under this chapter by the administrator shall be subject to a claim for the payment of an enforceable debt the owner owes in this state for:

Child-support arrearages, including child-support collection costs and child-support arrearages that are combined with maintenance;

A civil or criminal fine or penalty, court costs, a surcharge, or restitution imposed by a final order of an administrative agency or a final court judgment; or

State or local taxes, penalties, and interest that have been determined to be delinquent or as to which notice has been recorded with the county sheriff or local taking authority.

Before delivery or payment to an owner under subsection (1) of this section of property or payment to the owner of net proceeds of a sale of the property, the administrator first shall apply the property or net proceeds to a debt under subsection (2) of this section the administrator determines is owed by the owner. The administrator shall pay the amount to the appropriate state or local agency and notify the owner of the payment.

The administrator may make periodic inquiries of state and local agencies in the absence of a claim filed under KRS

393A.510

to determine whether an apparent owner included in the unclaimed-property records of this state has enforceable debts described in subsection (2) of this section. The administrator first shall apply the property or net proceeds of a sale of property held by the administrator to a debt under subsection (2) of this section of an apparent owner which appears in the records of the administrator and deliver the amount to the appropriate state or local agency. The administrator shall notify the apparent owner of the payment.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 53, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.540.
Filing a claim under KRS 393A.510 — Request for administrative hearing.

Not later than one (1) year after filing a claim under KRS 393A.510(1), the claimant may request in writing an administrative hearing, to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 54, effective July 14, 2018.